District of Columbia statutes.
34-1514

Repealed

Reliable Energy Trust Fund; public purpose programs.

Repealed.

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 114, 47 DCR 1091
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-342, § 304(b), 52 DCR 2346
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 2072, 54 DCR 7052
Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-250, § 212(a)(1), 55 DCR 9225
D.C. Law 15-342, in subsec. (b)(2)(C), substituted “kilowatt-hour, but shall not be less than $.0001 per kilowatt hour. Collection shall commence as of February 1, 2005.” for “kilowatt-hour.”; and added subsec. (e).
D.C. Law 17-20, in subsec. (a)(4), substituted “programs, including research, reports, and studies, ” for “programs”; and, in subsec. (c), added pars. (2)(B)(iii-I) and (4).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 304(b) of Omnibus Utility Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-12, January 28, 2005, 52 DCR 2945).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2072 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 212(a) of Clean and Affordable Energy Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-508, September 25, 2008, 55 DCR 10856).
Short title: Section 2071 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle H of title II of the act may be cited as the “Reliable Energy Trust Fund Amendment Act of 2007”.